Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB221.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 20-2201 is hereby amended to read as follows: 20-
2201. (a) A judicial council is hereby established and created which shall
be an independent agency in the judicial branch of government, shall
submit its budget separately and may adopt its own pay plan and personnel
rules.
(b)(1) The judicial council shall be composed of one justice of the
supreme court, one judge of the court of appeals, two district judges of
different judicial districts, four resident lawyers, the chairperson of the
judiciary committee of the house of representatives or the chairperson's
designate designee, and the chairperson of the judiciary committee of the
senate, and, subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4315c, and amendments
thereto, one resident lawyer from each congressional district.
(2) The provisions of paragraph (1), as amended by this act, shall not
affect the office of any member of the judicial council appointed prior to
July 1, 2025. On and after July 1, 2025, as positions become vacant on the
judicial council, appointments shall be made to comply with the provisions
of paragraph (1), as amended by this act.
(c) (1) All members except the members of the legislature shall be
appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court for a term of four years
and until a successor shall have been appointed and qualified.
(2) The terms of the members of the legislature, and all other
members, shall terminate upon such member ceasing to belong to the class
from which such member was appointed. All vacancies except those of the
members of the legislature shall be filled by appointment by the chief
justice for the unexpired term. Upon vacancy, the places of the members of
the legislature shall be filled by their successors.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 20-2201 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.